Utah statutes.
54-8-28.   Additional overhead facilities prohibited -- Exception.
Once removed, no overhead electric or communication facilities shall be
installed within the boundary of a local improvement district for conversion
of overhead electric and communication facilities in nominal voltages of less
than 35 thousand volts.
